Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4993.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [142D.40] TITLE. new text end new text begin Sections 142D.40 to 142D.48 shall be known as the "Minnesota Board of Early Care and Education Act." new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [142D.41] DEFINITIONS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Scope. new text end new text begin For the purposes of sections 142D.40 to 142D.48, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Board. new text end new text begin "Board" means the Minnesota Board of Early Care and Education. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Commissioner. new text end new text begin "Commissioner" means the commissioner of children, youth, and families. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Early care and education program. new text end new text begin "Early care and education program" means: new text end new text begin (1) a family and group family child care home licensed under Minnesota Rules, chapter 9502; new text end new text begin (2) a child care center licensed under Minnesota Rules, chapter 9503; new text end new text begin (3) a Tribally licensed child care program; new text end new text begin (4) a Head Start or Early Head Start organization; and new text end new text begin (5) a school-based early care and learning program for children in the period of life from birth to kindergarten. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Early childhood. new text end new text begin "Early childhood" means the period of life from birth to kindergarten. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Licensed health and safety program. new text end new text begin "Licensed health and safety program" means an early care and education program subject to licensing requirements under chapter 142B and Minnesota Rules, chapters 9502 and 9503. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Metropolitan area. new text end new text begin "Metropolitan area" has the meaning given in section 473.121, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Quality recognition pathway. new text end new text begin "Quality recognition pathway" means a standardized process approved by the board designed to demonstrate an early care and education program's excellence in providing early childhood cognitive, physical, social, and emotional development. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Recognized program. new text end new text begin "Recognized program" means an early care and education program that has completed all requirements of a quality recognition pathway and has attained a recognized early care and education program designation from the board. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin [142D.42] BOARD OF EARLY CARE AND EDUCATION; ESTABLISHMENT. new text end new text begin The Board of Early Care and Education is created to support the cognitive, physical, social, and emotional development of children attending early care and education programs through the development of program quality standards, improved early childhood educator qualifications, and the consolidation of existing state supports for early care and education programs and educators. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin [142D.43] BOARD STRUCTURE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Membership; officers. new text end new text begin (a) The board must carry out and enforce the purposes, powers, and duties of sections 142D.40 to 142D.48. The governor must appoint the following members in accordance with section 15.066: new text end new text begin (1) three employees of a child care center licensed under Minnesota Rules, chapter 9503, at least one from greater Minnesota and at least one from the metropolitan area; new text end new text begin (2) three individuals who are license holders of a family or group family child care home licensed under Minnesota Rules, chapter 9502, at least one from greater Minnesota and at least one from the metropolitan area; new text end new text begin (3) two employees of an early care and education program operated by a public school district or charter school, one from greater Minnesota and one from the metropolitan area; new text end new text begin (4) one representative of a federally recognized Tribe in Minnesota who has expertise in the Tribal early care and education system; new text end new text begin (5) one representative of a Head Start or Early Head Start program; new text end new text begin (6) two parents of children who are currently attending or have attended any type of early care and education program in the past three years, one from greater Minnesota and one from the metropolitan area; new text end new text begin (7) one pediatrician with expertise in developmental and behavioral pediatrics or early childhood mental health or a licensed mental health professional with expertise in early childhood development; new text end new text begin (8) one faculty member or researcher of a higher education or research institution with expertise in early childhood education or development; and new text end new text begin (9) the commissioner or the commissioner's designee. new text end new text begin (b) In making appointments under this subdivision, the governor must, to the extent practicable, reflect the racial, ethnic, cultural, and linguistic diversity of children, families, and early childhood educators in Minnesota and include representation from individuals with experience serving children with disabilities. new text end new text begin (c) Initial appointments must be made by August 1, 2027. new text end new text begin (d) The board must elect a member to serve as the chairperson at the first meeting. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Terms; compensation; removal; vacancies. new text end new text begin The membership terms, compensation, removal of members, and filling of vacancies on the board are governed by section 15.0575. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Meetings. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner or the commissioner's designee must convene the first meeting within 60 days after appointments to the board are completed. new text end new text begin (b) The board must meet at least quarterly. new text end new text begin (c) Meetings of the board are subject to chapter 13D. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Department support. new text end new text begin The commissioner must provide support staff, office space, and administrative services to the board. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [142D.44] DUTIES. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Quality recognition pathways. new text end new text begin The board must identify and approve multiple quality recognition pathways in accordance with section 142D.45. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Educator standards. new text end new text begin The board must establish standards for early childhood educator qualifications in accordance with section 142D.46. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Supports. new text end new text begin The board must review and consolidate existing state policies for supporting an early care and education program in accordance with section 142D.47. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Reports. new text end new text begin The board must provide reports in accordance with section 142D.48, subdivision 3. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Variances. new text end new text begin (a) The board may grant variances to requirements established under sections 142D.40 to 142D.48 that do not affect the health or safety of individuals in an early care and education program if the following conditions are met: new text end new text begin (1) the variance must be requested by an applicant on a form and in a manner prescribed by the board; new text end new text begin (2) the request for a variance must include the reasons the applicant cannot comply with a requirement as stated and the alternative equivalent measures the applicant will follow to comply with the intent of the standard; and new text end new text begin (3) the request must state the period of time for which the variance is requested. new text end new text begin (b) The board's decision to grant or deny a variance request is final and not subject to appeal under the provisions of chapter 14. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Review of standards. new text end new text begin The board must review and update approved quality recognition pathways, educator requirements, and supports at least every two years. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Considerations. new text end new text begin In exercising the board's duties under this section, the board must: new text end new text begin (1) consider data on child development and learning, early care and education program supply, and the early care and education workforce, including data disaggregated by race, ethnicity, geography, income, and disability status; new text end new text begin (2) review current research on child development and effective early care and education practices; new text end new text begin (3) solicit and consider information from families, early childhood educators, program leaders, experts in early care and education, and community organizations, including those representing racially, culturally, and linguistically diverse communities; new text end new text begin (4) consider information from Tribal governments and state and local government entities with responsibilities related to early care and education; and new text end new text begin (5) assess the estimated impacts and costs of proposed board actions for early care and education programs. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin [142D.45] DUTIES; QUALITY RECOGNITION PATHWAYS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Pathway approval. new text end new text begin (a) The board must: new text end new text begin (1) identify and approve multiple quality recognition pathways; new text end new text begin (2) approve a sufficient number of quality recognition pathways to accommodate different early care and education program types and sizes; and new text end new text begin (3) provide quality recognition pathways for licensed health and safety programs and early care and education programs not subject to licensing requirements under chapter 142B and Minnesota Rules, chapters 9502 and 9503. new text end new text begin (b) The board may approve a national accreditation or certification as a quality recognition pathway or an alternative quality recognition pathway designed to provide more flexibility and reflect differences in early care and education program methodology and settings. The board must establish clear parameters and measures for each alternative pathway option. new text end new text begin (c) All quality recognition pathways approved by the board must: new text end new text begin (1) be based on current early childhood development and learning research; new text end new text begin (2) rely on industry-led quality standards and measures of child care excellence; new text end new text begin (3) align with the commissioner's early childhood indicators of progress; new text end new text begin (4) use comparable evidence of practice and child development; and new text end new text begin (5) include third-party verification methods. new text end new text begin (d) The board must approve each third-party verification entity that has the authority to verify whether an early care and education program has met the requirements of a quality recognition pathway. Third-party verification entities include but are not limited to a professional membership organization, a postsecondary institution, a research organization, or a Tribal or cultural organization. The board must publicly post a list of approved third-party verification entities. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Interaction with licensing. new text end new text begin (a) Nothing in this section alters the health and safety licensing requirements under chapter 142B and Minnesota Rules, chapters 9502 and 9503. A licensed health and safety program must comply with all health and safety requirements in addition to all requirements established by the board for the program's selected quality recognition pathway. new text end new text begin (b) The board must provide a clear process for the transition from a licensed health and safety program to a recognized early care and education program. new text end new text begin (c) The board must not duplicate statutory and administrative rule requirements when approving quality recognition pathways and adopting rules under section 142D.48. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Mandatory participation. new text end new text begin Participation in a quality recognition pathway is mandatory. An early care and education program must become a recognized program to receive state and federal money under sections 142A.44, 142D.21, and 142D.25, and chapter 142E. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin [142D.46] DUTIES; EDUCATOR STANDARDS. new text end new text begin (a) The board must identify and approve standards for different levels of qualifications. In developing standards, the board must consult with early childhood educators across different types of early care and education programs, postsecondary institutions, Tribal governments, and relevant state agencies. new text end new text begin (b) Standards for all levels of qualification established by the board must: new text end new text begin (1) be based on current early childhood development and learning research; new text end new text begin (2) rely on industry-led quality standards and measures of early childhood professional excellence; new text end new text begin (3) align with nationally recognized knowledge and competencies frameworks for early childhood professionals; and new text end new text begin (4) reflect multiple methods of demonstrating competency beyond a postsecondary degree. new text end new text begin (c) The board must work with the commissioner to ensure board standards are reflected in rules and policies promulgated by the commissioner. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin [142D.47] DUTIES; SUPPORTS. new text end new text begin (a) The board must review state policies to improve program access to state support. The board must focus its review on aligning existing state supports with quality recognition pathways approved under section 142D.45 and educator qualifications established under section 142D.46. new text end new text begin (b) The board may recommend rule, statutory, or budgetary changes to existing state policies. Recommendations must be submitted in writing to the commissioner and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over early childhood care and education. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin [142D.48] AUTHORITY OF THE BOARD; REPORTS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Rulemaking authority. new text end new text begin (a) The board may adopt rules subject to the provisions of chapter 14 necessary to carry out the powers, duties, and responsibilities given to the board under sections 142D.40 to 142D.48. new text end new text begin (b) In the event of a conflict between a rule adopted by the board and a rule adopted by another state agency, the rule adopted by the board applies. new text end new text begin (c) Notwithstanding paragraph (b), if the commissioner determines a rule adopted by the board conflicts with a licensing provision under chapter 142B or Minnesota Rules, chapter 9502 or 9503, the board rule does not apply. new text end new text begin (d) The commissioner may, upon receipt of a board proposal, accept, adopt, and issue the board proposal by rule with any modifications or amendments the commissioner deems appropriate. The commissioner may refer a proposal back to the board with recommendations for further study, consideration, or revision. If the commissioner refuses to adopt a board proposal or issue a board proposal by rule or other appropriate action, the commissioner must provide a written explanation of the reason for the refusal to the board within 30 days after the board submitted the proposal to the commissioner. Any amendments to a board proposal made by the commissioner must be shared in writing with the board. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Advisory task force. new text end new text begin The board may create an advisory task force under section 15.014 with a majority of members who have a working knowledge of early care and education. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Reports. new text end new text begin (a) On or before December 1 of each year, the board must submit a report to the governor and the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over child care licensing summarizing the work of the board. The report must include, at a minimum, any recommended statutory changes or administrative rule proposals and the funding necessary to implement the recommendations. new text end new text begin (b) On or before December 1 of each year, the board must publicly report on the impacts of state policies on child development and learning, early care and education program supply, and early care and education workforce qualifications and stability. new text end new text begin (c) The board may request data and information from state agencies to carry out the board's duties under sections 142D.40 to 142D.48. To the extent permitted by law, state agencies must provide the requested data or information or a written explanation of any limitations on providing the data or information. new text end Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142E.07, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Child care development fund plan development; review. new text begin (a) new text end In an effort to improve state legislative involvement in the development of the Minnesota child care and development fund plan, the commissioner must present a draft copy of the plan to the legislative finance committees that oversee child care assistance funding no less than 30 days prior to the required deadline for submission of the plan to the federal government. The legislature must submit any adjustments to the plan to the commissioner for consideration within ten business days of receiving the draft plan. The commissioner must present a copy of the final plan to the chairs of the legislative finance committees that oversee child care assistance funding no less than four days prior to the deadline for submission of the plan to the federal government. new text begin (b) The commissioner must present a draft copy of the plan and money reserved for activities to improve the quality of child care services under the child care and development block grant to the Board of Early Care and Education no less than 30 days prior to the required deadline for submission of the plan to the federal government. The Board of Early Care and Education must submit any adjustments to the plan to the commissioner for consideration within ten business days of receiving the draft plan. The commissioner must present a copy of the final plan to the Board of Early Care and Education no less than four days before the deadline for submission of the plan to the federal government. The commissioner must include with the submission of the final plan a written explanation of the Board of Early Care and Education adjustments pertaining to the use of quality set-aside money that was rejected. new text end Sec. 11. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the Board of Early Care and Education for the purposes of carrying out the board's duties under Minnesota Statutes, sections 142D.40 to 142D.48. new text end Sec. 12. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin Sections 1 to 11 are effective the day following final enactment. new text end